Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,192
International Registration Plan Act; act, how cited.

Sections 60-3,192 to 60-3,206 shall be known and may be cited as the International Registration Plan Act.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 192.